Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.650

Recommendations by committee to legislature.

The rules review committee may recommend to the legislature that the original enabling legislation serving as authority for the adoption of any rule reviewed by the committee be amended or repealed in such manner as the committee deems advisable.

[ 1988 c 288 s 605; 1987 c 451 s 4; 1981 c 324 s 9. Formerly RCW 34.04.250.]

NOTES:

Legislative affirmation—Severability—1981 c 324: See notes following RCW 34.05.010.